Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-205 Firm offers. An offer by a
merchant to buy or sell goods in a signed writing which by its terms gives
assurance that it will be held open is not revocable, for lack of
consideration, during the time stated or if no time is stated for a reasonable
time, but in no event may such period of irrevocability exceed three months;
but any such term of assurance on a form supplied by the offeree must be
separately signed by the offeror. [L 1965, c 208, §2-205; HRS §490:2-205]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next